Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1162.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-405.04, to read: START_STATUTE36-405.04. Licensing and monitoring of health care institutions; joint review of monitoring and compliance functions; reporting requirement A. The department shall license and monitor the operation of health care institutions to ensure compliance with this chapter. B. The department and the Arizona health care cost containment system shall coordinate to review monitoring and compliance functions to identify areas of overlap related to health care institution licensing standards. The review must include, at a minimum: 1. Licensing, certification and enrollment requirements. 2. On-site surveys, inspections, audits and other compliance activities. 3. Data collection and reporting requirements. 4. Corrective action and enforcement processes applicable to health care institutions. C. The department and the Arizona health care cost containment system shall: 1. Identify opportunities to eliminate or reduce duplicative, redundant or inconsistent requirements while maintaining patient safety and appropriate regulatory oversight. 2. Coordinate or align policies, procedures and operational practices to minimize administrative burdens on health care institutions. D. This section does not require any action that is inconsistent with federal medicaid conditions of participation or conditions of payment or other applicable federal requirements. E. On or before December 31, 2026 and on or before October 31 every four years thereafter, the department shall submit a written report to the house of representatives and the senate health and human services committees, or their successor committees, that summarizes the findings of the review, identifies areas of duplication or overlap and includes recommendations for statutory, regulatory or administrative changes. F. On or before December 31, 2026, the DEPARTMENT and the Arizona health care cost containment system shall review their rules and policies RELATING to behavioral health technicians to ensure alignment with article 4.1 of this chapter.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 36, chapter 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 4.1, to read: ARTICLE 4.1. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH TECHNICIANS START_STATUTE36-444. Definition of behavioral health technician In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, "behavioral health technician" means an individual to whom all of the following apply: 1. Is employed by a behavioral health facility or by a hospital authorized to provide psychiatric services that is a licensed health care institution pursuant to this chapter. 2. Provides behavioral health services under the supervision or clinical oversight of either: (a) A licensed behavioral health professional. (b) A registered nurse who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15, who is working within the registered nurse's scope of practice and who is providing supervision in a facility that is licensed as a hospital pursuant to this chapter. 3. Performs only delegated clinical and supportive functions consistent with the individual's demonstrated training and competence and the employing behavioral health facility's or hospital's policies and procedures.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-444.01. Qualifications; standards A. A behavioral health technician shall: 1. Be at least eighteen years of age. 2. Possess a minimum of a high school diploma or the equivalent. 3. Successfully complete any required background checks. B. Before providing supervised direct services, a behavioral health technician shall complete training that addresses: 1. Behavioral health system orientation. 2. Confidentiality and compliance. 3. Professional boundaries and ethics. 4. Crisis response and de-escalation techniques and skills. 5. Trauma-informed and recovery-oriented care. C. A behavioral health facility or hospital may adopt internal standards for behavioral health technicians that exceed statutory minimums. The employing behavioral health facility or hospital shall provide ongoing training that the behavioral health facility or hospital requires or that is required by law. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-444.02. Duties A. A behavioral health technician may provide services consistent with the individual's training, delegation and supervision, including: 1. Implementing client treatment, service or recovery plans. 2. Providing skills training and supportive counseling to support behavioral, emotional and recovery-oriented functioning of clients. 3. Assisting with client self-administration of medication as authorized by law or within an applicable scope of practice. 4. Completing documentation and clerical activities related to client care. 5. Contributing to client assessments and service planning, including: (a) Interviewing and recording client history, current status and desired goals. (b) Gathering and recording collateral and supportive documentation to assist in developing the service plan. (c) Recording strengths, needs, abilities and preferences into a service plan. 6. Providing education regarding treatment options and community resources. 7. Submitting allowable billing consistent with payer requirements. 8. Supporting mobile crisis teams and their interventions, including engagement, de-escalation, safety planning, follow-up coordination, collection of collateral information and assistance with assessment activities. 9. Providing client transportation, meal preparation and daily living supports consistent with treatment goals. 10. Scheduling client appointments and providing case management support activities. 11. Monitoring and documenting vital signs of clients and other health indicators for which the behavioral health technician has received appropriate training and authorization. 12. providing Other supportive or rehabilitative services consistent with the individual's training and supervision and the employing behavioral health facility's or hospital's license. B. This section does not authorize any behavioral health technician to diagnose medical or behavioral health conditions, prescribe medications or provide services beyond those that are delegated to the behavioral health technician and supervised by a licensed behavioral health professional or a registered nurse who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.